Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,124.03
Remedial action plan; considerations.

The plan for remedial action shall take into account risk-based corrective action assessment principles which identify the risks presented to the public health and safety or the environment by each release in a manner that will protect the public health and safety and the environment using, to the extent appropriate, a tiered approach consistent with the American Society for Testing of Materials standards.

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 17.